Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2334
Rules and regulations.

The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out section 76-2333 and subsection (2) of section 76-2325, including general rules of practice and procedure relating to the committee, training requirements for investigators, and rules governing the investigation process.

Laws 2023, LB683, § 10.